Delaware, session 153, HB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 29, Title 55 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5535. Denial of benefits to education employees (a) This section applies to any individual employed by the State Department of Education, a school district which is part of the state school system, the University of Delaware, Delaware State University, or Delaware Technical and Community College. (b) An individual who would otherwise be eligible to receive a service or disability pension as provided in this chapter shall not be entitled or permitted to receive the stateâs contribution to such pension, or interest upon the individualâs own contribution, following the Executive Secretaryâs receipt of a written notification from the individualâs employer (or former employer) certifying that: (i) The individual has been convicted under one or more of the following statutes: 11 Del C. 1108, 11 Del C. 1112A , 11 Del C. 1112B, or 11 Del C. 1112C; (ii) The conviction was based on acts carried out pursuant to or in connection with the individualâs employment; and (iii) The conviction occurred after [the effective date]. (c) The survivor of any individual denied a pension under this section shall be entitled to receive the survivor benefits described in this chapter following the death of such individual, provided the individual has completed an application as required under Â§ 5531 and such individual has not received the withdrawal benefit provided by Â§ 5530 of this Title.